District of Columbia statutes.
4-1302.04

Release of information for research and evaluation.

The staff which maintains the Child Protection Register may release information from said Register for research and evaluation only upon an order of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia; provided, however, that no information identifying the persons named in a report shall be made available to the researcher or evaluator.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title II, § 204, 24 DCR 3341
1973 Ed., § 6-2114.
1981 Ed., § 6-2114.
This section is referenced in § 4-1302.03 and § 4-1303.06.